Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6192XS (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2182 Section 1. Section 99B.1, subsection 20, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 20. âGame of chanceâ means a game whereby the result is 3 determined by chance and the player in order to win completes 4 activities, such as aligning objects or balls in a prescribed 5 pattern or order or makes certain color patterns appear. âGame 6 of chanceâ specifically includes but is not limited to bingo 7 and queen of hearts . âGame of chanceâ does not include a slot 8 machine or amusement device. 9 Sec. 2. Section 99B.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 10 following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 29A. âQueen of heartsâ means a game, 12 whether known as queen of hearts or any other name, which 13 is played over multiple rounds and in which each participant 14 enters a raffle for the chance to choose a concealed card from 15 among the fifty-four cards in a standard deck of playing cards. 16 The winner of the raffle may also be awarded a cash prize. If 17 a participant chooses the card previously designated as the 18 winning card, the participant receives the jackpot and the game 19 ends. If a participant does not choose the card previously 20 designated as the winning card, the participant may receive 21 a cash prize, and a new raffle for the chance to choose a 22 card commences. The standard deck of playing cards is not 23 replenished between raffles. 24 Sec. 3. Section 99B.13, subsection 4, paragraphs a and c, 25 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 26 a. A Except as otherwise provided in section 99B.28, a 27 gambling activity shall not be operated on a build-up or 28 pyramid basis. 29 c. Concealed numbers or conversion charts shall not be used 30 in conducting any gambling activity except as part of a game of 31 queen of hearts conducted pursuant to section 99B.28 . 32 Sec. 4. Section 99B.15, subsection 1, paragraphs a and d, 33 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 34 a. (1) Only merchandise prizes whose value does not exceed 35 -1- LSB 6192XS (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 4 S.F. 2182 ten thousand dollars may be awarded for games of skill and 1 games of chance. If a prize consists of more than one item, 2 unit, or part, the aggregate value of all items, units, or 3 parts shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. 4 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), a chance to select a 5 card may be awarded as a prize for a raffle that is part of a 6 game of queen of hearts. 7 d. A cash prize may only be awarded in bingo , queen of 8 hearts, and raffles. 9 Sec. 5. Section 99B.24, subsection 1, paragraphs a, c, and 10 d, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 11 a. The winner of a raffle shall not be required to be 12 present to win , except that the winner of a raffle that is part 13 of a game of queen of hearts may be required to be present to 14 win . 15 c. (1) A cash or merchandise prize may be awarded in a 16 raffle. If a merchandise prize is awarded, the actual retail 17 value of the prize, or if the prize consists of more than one 18 item, unit, or part, the aggregate retail value of all items, 19 units, or parts, shall not exceed the maximum value allowed for 20 that raffle. 21 (2) A chance to select a card may be awarded as a prize for 22 a raffle that is part of a game of queen of hearts. 23 d. Calendar raffles and build-up or pyramid raffles 24 are prohibited except as part of a game of queen of hearts 25 conducted pursuant to section 99B.28 . 26 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 99B.28 Queen of hearts. 27 1. A licensed qualified organization may conduct queen of 28 hearts as permitted by the applicable license and in accordance 29 with the requirements of this section. 30 2. a. A cash prize may be awarded to the winner of a raffle 31 conducted as part of a game of queen of hearts, regardless of 32 whether the participant chooses a winning card. 33 b. A cash prize may be awarded to a person who picks a card 34 other than the winning card. 35 -2- LSB 6192XS (3) 91 ss/ns 2/ 4 S.F. 2182 c. A cash prize may be awarded as the jackpot for queen of 1 hearts. 2 d. A cash prize awarded for any part of a game of queen of 3 hearts shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. 4 3. Queen of hearts may be conducted on a build-up or pyramid 5 basis. 6 4. A licensed qualified organization may require a 7 participant to be present to win a raffle that is part of a game 8 of queen of hearts, or may allow a participant to choose a card 9 in advance if the participant is not present for the raffle. 10 5. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 11 to administer this section. 12